Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1560.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Municipal Grant Assistance Program Act.Section 2. Declarations.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Many municipalities lack the expertise and resources to effectively seek grants for which they may be qualified.(2) This gap in expertise and resources creates a disparity in the opportunity to pursue economic development and community enhancement opportunities between those municipalities obtaining State funds and those that may have a greater need.1234567891011121314151617 (3) The availability of professional grant writers increases the opportunities for a municipality to obtain grant funding.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Eligible grant writer." An individual registered with the Bureau of Charitable Organizations within the Department of State under section 8 of the act of December 19, 1990 (P.L.1200, No.202), known as the Solicitation of Funds for Charitable Purposes Act."Fund." The Municipal Grant Assistance Program Fund established under section 6."Low-income census tract." A census tract where:(1) the poverty rate is at least 20%;(2) for tracts not located within a metropolitan area, the median family income does not exceed 80% of Statewide median family income; or(3) for tracts located within a metropolitan area, the median family income does not exceed 80% of the greater of Statewide median family income or the metropolitan area median family income."Municipality." A city of the third class, borough, incorporated town or township."Program." The Municipal Grant Assistance Program established under section 4.Section 4. Establishment.20250HB1560PN1844 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The Municipal Grant Assistance Program is established within the department and shall be administered by the department. The department may establish the program within existing departmental municipal technical assistance programs in whole or in part. The program shall consist of financial assistance to municipalities to obtain grant writing services and to develop a training program to teach municipal employees and officials how to develop projects, find grant application opportunities and apply for grants.Section 5. Administration of program.(a) Personnel.--The department may hire new personnel, dedicate current personnel or contract with third parties for the implementation and administration of the program.(b) Guidelines.--The department shall, within 90 days of the effective date of this section, develop and publish guidelines for the implementation and administration of the program, which shall include:(1) a listing of eligible grant writers participating in the program within this Commonwealth;(2) application procedures and guidelines for municipalities;(3) the development and delivery of grant writing training to commence within six months following the effective date of this section;(4) criteria for fund allocations and municipal matching fund requirements;(5) limitations on fund use; and(6) disbursements from the fund.(c) Eligibility.--To be eligible for a grant to obtain grant-writing services, a municipality may not have an employee 20250HB1560PN1844 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 whose primary responsibility is grant writing. In addition, a municipality must meet at least one of the following qualifications:(1) Adopted and is implementing an active Strategic Management Planning Program plan, recovery plan, exit plan or receivership plan adopted under the act of July 10, 1987 (P.L.246, No.47), known as the Municipalities Financial Recovery Act.(2) At least 25% of all census tracts within the municipality are designated as low-income census tracts.(d) Contracts.--A municipality or the department may enter into a contract with an eligible grant writer for a single grant or multiple grants. Grant writers shall be paid according to the department's funding criteria under subsection (b)(4).(e) Advisory committee.--The department may establish an advisory committee to accept stakeholder input on the administration of the program, to include municipal officials, representatives from the Bureau of Charitable Organizations within the Department of State, municipal associations, economic development agencies and chambers of business and industry.Section 6. Municipal Grant Assistance Program Fund.The Municipal Grant Assistance Program Fund is established in the State Treasury. The money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the purposes of this act. Any interest earned on money in the fund shall be deposited into the fund.Section 7. Reports.Within five years of the effective date of this section, the Local Government Commission shall provide a report to the General Assembly on the funding and effectiveness of the 20250HB1560PN1844 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 program.Section 8. Administrative expenses.The expenses of the department's administration of the program may be paid wholly or in part from the fund. If the department establishes the program within an existing departmental municipal technical assistance program, money from the fund may not be used for other programs within the department.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1560PN1844 - 5 - 12345678910